dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
SFX v1 N 128
SFX v1 ben abs aben is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ben abt aben is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 fen afs afen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 fen aft afen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 gen ags agen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 gen agt agen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 gen ägs ägen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 gen ägt ägen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 ken aks aken is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ken akt aken is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 len als alen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 len alt alen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 len äls älen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 len ält älen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 men ams amen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 men amt amen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 men äms ämen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 men ämt ämen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 nen ans anen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 nen ant anen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 nen äns änen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 nen änt änen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 pen aps apen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 pen apt apen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 ren ars aren is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ren art aren is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 sen ast asen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 sen äst äsen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 ven avs aven is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ven avt aven is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 zen azt azen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 ben ibs iben is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ben ibt iben is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 ken iks iken is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ken ikt iken is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 len ils ilen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 len ilt ilen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 zen izt izen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 ben obs oben is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ben obt oben is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 den öts öden is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 fen ofs ofen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 fen oft ofen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 ken oks oken is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ken okt oken is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 len ols olen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 len olt olen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 sen ost osen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 men oms omen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 men omt omen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 nen ons onen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 nen ont onen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 pen ops open is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 pen opt open is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 zen ozt ozen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 fen uft ufen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 fen ufs ufen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 pen upt upen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 pen ups upen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 sen ust usen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 ten uts uten is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 zen uzt uzen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 ben übs üben is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ben übt üben is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 gen ügs ügen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 gen ügt ügen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 sen üst üsen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 en 0 ten is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 den t den is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 nen öns önen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 nen önt önen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 den its iden is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ren ors oren is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 ren ort oren is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 pen ips ipen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 pen ipt ipen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 sen öst ösen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v1 en 0 [sxz]en is:ip is:2ps
SFX v1 0 0 . is:ip is:1ps
SFX v1 0 0 . is:ip is:1pp
SFX v1 0 0 . is:ip is:3pp
SFX v1 ben abt aben is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 fen aft afen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 gen agt agen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 gen ägt ägen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 ken akt aken is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 len alt alen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 len ält älen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 men amt amen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 men ämt ämen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 nen ant anen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 nen änt änen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 pen apt apen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 ren art aren is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 sen äst äsen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 sen ast asen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 ven avt aven is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 zen azt azen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 den t den is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 ben ibt iben is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 ken ikt iken is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 len ilt ilen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 pen ipt ipen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 zen izt izen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 ben obt oben is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 fen oft ofen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 ken okt oken is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 len olt olen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 men omt omen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 nen ont onen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 nen önt önen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 pen opt open is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 ren ort oren is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 sen ost osen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 sen öst ösen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 zen ozt ozen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 en 0 ten is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 ben übt üben is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 fen uft ufen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 gen ügt ügen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 pen upt upen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 sen ust usen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 sen üst üsen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 zen uzt uzen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v1 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX v1 n 0 . is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler
SFX v1 n 0 . is:ip is:1pp is:eifeler
SFX v1 n 0 . is:ip is:3pp is:eifeler

PFX g9 Y 58
PFX g9 op opge/** op
PFX g9 of ofge/** of
PFX g9 ëm ëmge/** ëm
PFX g9 a age/** an
PFX g9 a age/** a[^nu]
PFX g9 zréck zréckge/** zréck
PFX g9 zeréck zeréckge/** zeréck
PFX g9 aus ausge/** aus
PFX g9 iwwer iwwerge/** iwwer
PFX g9 bäi bäige/** bäi
PFX g9 dertëschent dertëschentge/** dertëschent
PFX g9 dobäi dobäige/** dobäi
PFX g9 dotëscht dotëschtge/** dotëscht
PFX g9 dout doutge/** dout
PFX g9 dra drage/** dra[^n]
PFX g9 dran drage/** dran
PFX g9 duerch duerchge/** duerch
PFX g9 déif déifge/** déif
PFX g9 entgéint entgéintge/** entgéint
PFX g9 eran erage/** eran
PFX g9 era erage/** era[^nu]
PFX g9 eraus erausge/** eraus
PFX g9 eriwwer eriwwerge/** eriwwer
PFX g9 erof erofge/** erof
PFX g9 erop eropge/** erop
PFX g9 erun eruge/** erun
PFX g9 eru eruge/** eru[^n]
PFX g9 erëm erëmge/** erëm
PFX g9 ewech ewechge/** ewech
PFX g9 fest festge/** fest
PFX g9 fort fortge/** fort
PFX g9 fräi fräige/** fräi
PFX g9 futti futtige/** futti
PFX g9 gläich gläichge/** gläich
PFX g9 gutt guttge/** gutt
PFX g9 grouss groussge/** grouss
PFX g9 hannescht hanneschtge/** hannescht
PFX g9 heem heemge/** heem
PFX g9 hin hige/** hin
PFX g9 hi hige/** hi[^n]
PFX g9 héich héichge/** héich
PFX g9 kapott kapottge/** kapott
PFX g9 krank krankge/** krank
PFX g9 laanscht laanschtge/** laanscht
PFX g9 lass lassge/** lass
PFX g9 mat matge/** mat
PFX g9 no noge/** no
PFX g9 un uge/** un
PFX g9 u uge/** u[^nu]
PFX g9 uu ugeuu/** uu
PFX g9 viraus virausge/** viraus
PFX g9 vir virge/** vir[^a]
PFX g9 weider weiderge/** weider
PFX g9 zesummen zesummege/** zesummen
PFX g9 zesumme zesummege/** zesumme[^n]
PFX g9 zou zouge/** zou
PFX g9 ënner ënnerge/** ënner
PFX g9 drop dropge/** drop

SFX p0 N 15
SFX p0 0 er/f6 [^se] is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p0 0 ser/f6 [^s]s is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p0 0 er/f6 ss is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p0 0 r/f6 [^e]e is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p0 0 ër/f6 ee is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p0 0 er [^se] is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p0 0 ser [^s]s is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p0 0 er ss is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p0 0 r [^e]e is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p0 0 ër ee is:toponym is:masculine is:plural
SFX p0 0 er [^se] is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p0 0 ser [^s]s is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p0 0 er ss is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p0 0 r [^e]e is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p0 0 ër ee is:toponym is:adjective

SFX z0 Y 30
SFX z0 0 fach [^n]
SFX z0 0 t [^t]
SFX z0 0 ten [^tn]
SFX z0 0 tens [^tn]
SFX z0 0 te [^tn] is:eifeler
SFX z0 0 anzwanzeg .
SFX z0 0 andrësseg .
SFX z0 0 avéierzeg .
SFX z0 0 afofzeg .
SFX z0 0 asiechzeg .
SFX z0 0 asiwwenzeg .
SFX z0 0 anachzeg .
SFX z0 0 annonzeg .
SFX z0 0 anzwanzeg .
SFX z0 0 mol [^n]
SFX z0 n mol n
SFX z0 0 anzwanzegmol .
SFX z0 0 andrëssegmol .
SFX z0 0 avéierzegmol .
SFX z0 0 afofzegmol .
SFX z0 0 asiechzegmol .
SFX z0 0 asiwwenzegmol .
SFX z0 0 anachzegmol .
SFX z0 0 annonzegmol .
SFX z0 0 anzwanzegmol .
SFX z0 n fach n
SFX z0 0 en/c0 t
SFX z0 0 ens t
SFX z0 0 ten/c0 wen
SFX z0 0 tens wen

PFX z1 Y 9
PFX z1 0 honnert .
PFX z1 0 zweehonnert .
PFX z1 0 dräihonnert .
PFX z1 0 véierhonnert .
PFX z1 0 fënnefhonnert .
PFX z1 0 sechshonnert .
PFX z1 0 siwenhonnert .
PFX z1 0 aachthonnert .
PFX z1 0 nénghonnert .

SFX z2 N 4
SFX z2 0 honnert .
SFX z2 0 eckeg .
SFX z2 0 honnertmol .
SFX z2 0 honnertfach .

SFX d1 N 10
SFX d1 fchen wercher fchen is:plural
SFX d1 tchen dercher [^i]tchen is:plural
SFX d1 sschen sercher sschen is:plural
SFX d1 dchen tercher edchen is:plural
SFX d1 dchen lercher ildchen is:plural
SFX d1 dchen nercher ndchen is:plural
SFX d1 dchen tercher ëldchen is:plural
SFX d1 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX d1 enchen ngercher eenchen is:plural
SFX d1 tchen dercher [^i]itchen is:plural
